Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 5. Soil Survey.

§§ 10.1-572,
10.1-573.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 785 and 819, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-572

, duty of Department to complete Virginia portion of National Cooperative Soil Survey, derived from Acts 1972, c. 557, § 21-5.2; 1984, c. 177; 1988, c. 891; 1994, c. 465; 1999, c. 155.

Former § 10.1-573, immunity from prosecution for trespass, derived from Acts 1975, c. 485, § 21-5.3; 1988, c. 891.